Utah statutes.
70A-9a-406.   Discharge of account debtor -- Notification of assignment --
Identification and proof of assignment -- Restrictions on assignment of
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes
ineffective.
(1)  Subject to Subsections (2) through (9), an account debtor on an account,
chattel paper, or a payment intangible may discharge its obligation by paying
the assignor until, but not after, the account debtor receives a notification,
authenticated by the assignor or the assignee, that the amount due or to
become due has been assigned and that payment is to be made to the assignee.
After receipt of the notification, the account debtor may discharge its
obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge the obligation by
paying the assignor.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (8), notification is ineffective under Subsection
(1):
(a)  if it does not reasonably identify the rights assigned;
(b)  to the extent that an agreement between an account debtor and a seller of
a payment intangible limits the account debtor's duty to pay a person other
than the seller and the limitation is effective under law other than this
chapter; or
(c)  at the option of an account debtor, if the notification notifies the
account debtor to make less than the full amount of any installment or other
periodic payment to the assignee, even if:
(i)  only a portion of the account, chattel paper, or payment intangible has
been assigned to that assignee;
(ii)  a portion has been assigned to another assignee; or
(iii)  the account debtor knows that the assignment to that assignee is
limited.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (8), if requested by the account debtor, an
assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has
been made.  Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may discharge its
obligation by paying the assignor, even if the account debtor has received a
notification under Subsection (1).
(4)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5) and Sections 70A-2a-303
and 70A-9a-407, and subject to Subsection (8), a term in an agreement between
an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note is ineffective to
the extent that it:
(a)  prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the account debtor or
person obligated on the promissory note to the assignment or transfer of, or
the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest
in, the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note; or
(b)  provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment,
perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a
default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of
termination, or remedy under the account, chattel paper, payment intangible,
or promissory note.
(5) Subsection (4) does not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or
promissory note.
(6)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 70A-2a-303 and 70A-9a-407 and
subject to Subsections (8) and (9), a rule of law, statute, or regulation that
prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, governmental
body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or
creation of a security interest in, an account or chattel paper is ineffective
to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation:
(a)  prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the government,
governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer
of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security
interest in the account or chattel paper; or
(b)  provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment,
perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a
default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of
termination, or remedy under the account or chattel paper.
(7)  Subject to Subsection (8), an account debtor may not waive or vary its
option under Subsection (2)(c).
(8)  This section is subject to law other than this chapter which establishes
a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred
the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(9)  This section does not apply to an assignment of a health-care-insurance
receivable.
